District of Columbia statutes.
16-3112

Costs and execution.

The Probate Court may render judgment for costs against the unsuccessful party in any proceeding conducted in the court, and issue execution thereof.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 601, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 5(c), 27 DCR 2900

Cross References

Fees and costs in civil proceedings, see § 15-701 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3112.
1973 Ed., § 16-3113.